Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 13. General Provisions.

Sec. 10.06.950.
Powers of commissioner.

The commissioner has the power and authority reasonably necessary to enable the commissioner to administer this chapter and to perform the duties imposed upon the commissioner by this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.953.
Regulations.

To the extent provided by explicit reference in this chapter, the department shall adopt regulations referred to in this chapter in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62).

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For corporations, partnerships, and other business organizations, see 3 AAC 16.

Sec. 10.06.955.
Application to existing corporations.

This chapter applies to a domestic corporation organized under former AS 10.05 (the Alaska Business Corporation Act), and to the extent provided in AS

10.06.010

,

10.06.020

,

10.06.233

,

10.06.433(g)

,

10.06.435

,

10.06.450(d)

, and

10.06.705

—

10.06.870

to a foreign corporation authorized to do or doing business in this state.

The existence of a corporation formed or existing on the date of enactment of this chapter is not affected by the enactment of this chapter or by any change in the requirements for the formation of corporations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 126 SLA 1994)

Cross references. —

See also §§ 7 and 9, ch. 166, SLA 1988; § 10, ch. 166, SLA 1988, as amended by § 57, ch. 50, SLA 1989; and §§ 57 and 58, ch. 82, SLA 1989 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 10.06.958.
Provisions construed as restatements and continuations.

If a provision of this chapter is substantially the same as a statutory provision in former AS 10.05 existing on July 1, 1989, it shall be construed as a restatement and continuation, and not as a new enactment.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.960.
Corporations organized under Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act.

A corporation organized under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. as amended (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) shall be incorporated under and is subject to this chapter except

each corporation shall issue without further consideration the number of shares of common stock that may be necessary to comply with the requirements of the Act and all stock so issued is considered fully paid and nonassessable when issued;

unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, the capital

is considered the consideration for the initial issuance of shares; and

of a corporation organized under the Act includes the

land or interests in it conveyed to the corporation by the United States under the Act, except that which is required to be conveyed under 43 U.S.C. 1613(c)(1), (3), and (4), entered at its fair value to the corporation upon receiving the conveyance of it; and

money, when received under 43 U.S.C. 1605 and 43 U.S.C. 1608, that is retained by the corporation and that is not immediately distributed or required to be distributed under 43 U.S.C. 1606(j).

Notwithstanding the provision of AS

10.06.305

—

10.06.390

, payment from the money of a corporation organized under the Act that is required by the language of the Act to be distributed to shareholders or to other corporations so organized is not a distribution to its shareholders as defined in AS

10.06.990

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of AS

10.06.546

, a plan of merger, consolidation, or exchange in which each participating corporation either (1) was organized under the Act, within the same one of the 12 regions of Alaska established under the Act, or (2) resulted from the prior merger, consolidation, or exchange of other similarly organized corporations within the same region, is approved if it receives the affirmative vote of the holders of at least a majority of the outstanding shares of each corporation. If a class of shares of a corporation specified in this subsection is entitled to vote as a class, the plan of merger, consolidation, or exchange is approved if it receives the affirmative vote of the holders of at least a majority of the outstanding shares of each class of shares entitled to vote as a class and of the total outstanding shares. Notwithstanding AS

10.06.574

—

10.06.582

, a plan of merger, consolidation, or exchange approved under this section before December 19, 1991, may not include a right of shareholders to dissent.

[Repealed, § 21 ch 6 SLA 1993.]

Notwithstanding the provision of AS

10.06.502

—

10.06.510

, a corporation organized under the Act may amend its articles by a vote of the board of directors in order for the corporation to comply with the mandatory requirements of the Act.

Notwithstanding the other provisions of this chapter, a corporation organized under the Act is governed by the Act to the extent the Act is inconsistent with this chapter, and the corporation may take any action, including amendment of its articles, authorized by the Act, and the action is considered to be approved and adopted if approved under the Act. An amendment approved under the Act and delivered to the commissioner under AS

10.06.512

shall be filed by the commissioner under AS

10.06.910

, and a certificate of amendment shall be issued.

Notwithstanding AS

10.06.358

, if there are no retained earnings, the directors of a corporation organized under the Act may declare and pay distributions in cash or property out of its net profits for the fiscal year in which the distribution is declared and for the preceding fiscal year, except when the corporation is insolvent under AS

10.06.360

. For the purposes of this subsection, a corporation’s debts include the amounts it is required to distribute under 43 U.S.C. 1606(i) and 43 U.S.C. 1606(j). The directors may determine the net profits derived from the exploitation or liquidation of wasting assets without consideration of the depletion of those assets resulting from lapse of time, consumption, liquidation, or exploitation, of the assets, and a distribution declared from those net profits shall be described, concurrently with distribution of the net profits to shareholders, as a distribution from wasting assets without consideration of the depletion of the assets. In this subsection, “wasting assets” means timber resources and subsurface estates.

Notwithstanding AS

10.06.358

, the directors of a corporation organized under the Act may, from time to time, distribute to its shareholders in partial liquidation a portion of the corporation’s assets out of capital, in cash or property, except that a distribution

may not be made at a time when the corporation is insolvent under AS

10.06.360

;

may not be made unless the articles of incorporation authorize the board to make the distribution or the distribution is authorized by the affirmative vote of the holders of at least two-thirds of the outstanding shares;

when made, shall be identified as a distribution in partial liquidation and the amount per share shall be disclosed to the shareholders concurrently with the distribution.

Notwithstanding AS

10.06.633

(e), a corporation that is organized as a Native corporation under the Act, that has been involuntarily dissolved by the commissioner under AS

10.06.633

, and that has failed to apply for reinstatement during the period established under AS

10.06.633(e)

, may be reinstated under AS

10.06.633(e)

within one year of June 29, 1994. The reinstated corporation and its shareholders have all of the rights, privileges, liabilities, and obligations that would have applied to them if the corporation had not been dissolved, and all corporate and shareholder actions taken during the period of dissolution are considered to be as valid as if dissolution had not occurred.

If a corporation is formed before June 29, 1994 to replace a Native corporation that has been involuntarily dissolved under AS

10.06.633

, and if the replacing corporation has the same name as the dissolved corporation, the replacing corporation and its shareholders succeed, upon payment of any amounts that would have been required for the reinstatement of the dissolved corporation under AS

10.06.633

(e), to all of the rights, privileges, liabilities, and obligations that would have applied to the dissolved corporation and its shareholders if the dissolved corporation had been reinstated under AS

10.06.633(e)

.

Notwithstanding (i) of this section and AS

10.06.633

(e), a corporation that is organized as a Native village corporation under the Act, that has been involuntarily dissolved by the commissioner under AS

10.06.633

, and that has failed to apply for reinstatement during the period established under AS

10.06.633(e)

may be reinstated under AS

10.06.633(e)

on or before December 31, 2020. The reinstated corporation and its shareholders have all of the rights, privileges, liabilities, and obligations that would have applied to them if the corporation had not been dissolved, and all corporate and shareholder actions taken during the period of dissolution are considered to be as valid as if dissolution had not occurred. If a corporation elects to reinstate under this subsection and if the corporation’s previously used corporate name is no longer available for use by the corporation, then, notwithstanding AS

10.06.502

—

10.06.510

, an amendment to the articles of incorporation changing the previously used corporate name may be adopted by action of the corporation’s board of directors alone.

[Renumbered as AS

10.06.504(d)

.]

[Renumbered as AS

10.06.504(e)

.]

Notwithstanding AS

10.06.504(d)

, an amendment to the articles of incorporation of a corporation organized under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) and incorporated under former AS 10.05.005 to add a provision eliminating or limiting the personal liability of a director to the corporation or its stockholders for monetary damages under AS

10.06.210

(1)(M) may be adopted by the affirmative vote of a majority of the shares represented at the regular or special meeting at which a quorum is present in person, by proxy, or by remote communication.

Notwithstanding AS

10.06.455(b)

and

10.06.504(d)

, an amendment to the articles of incorporation of a village corporation organized under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act) and incorporated under former AS 10.05.005 to add a provision authorizing the classification of directors under AS

10.06.455

may be adopted by the affirmative vote of a majority of the shares represented at a regular or special meeting at which a quorum is present in person, by proxy, or by remote communication.

Notwithstanding AS

10.06.504(d)

, a Native corporation incorporated under former AS 10.05 before July 1, 1989, may amend its articles under this subsection to reduce the quorum necessary to hold a meeting of shareholders to one-third of the outstanding shares entitled to vote at a meeting, represented in person, by remote communication, or by proxy. An amendment under this subsection is approved if it receives an affirmative vote of two-thirds of the shares represented in person, by remote communication, or by proxy at an annual meeting. The Native corporation may not use the reduced quorum established under this subsection to adopt other amendments of the articles or to adopt resolutions to which 43 U.S.C. 1629b applies. AS

10.06.504(d)

continues to apply to the adoption of other amendments of the articles.

In this section,

“Act ” means 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act);

“Native corporation” has the meaning given in 43 U.S.C. 1602(m).

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 53, 54 ch 82 SLA 1989; am § 21 ch 6 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 120 SLA 1994; am §§ 1, 2 ch 24 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 127 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 31 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 2003; am §§ 3 — 14 ch 56 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 77 SLA 2005; am § 15 ch 22 SLA 2015; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 2015; am § 1 ch 86 SLA 2018; am §§ 15 — 17 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, the word “and” was inserted preceding “the corporation may take” in the first sentence of subsection (f).

Subsections (i) and (j) were enacted as (j) and (k) respectively. Relettered in 1994, at which time former (i) was relettered as (k). Subsection (k) was enacted as (

l

) and relettered in 1996. Former subsections (

l

) and (m) were enacted as § 10(a) and (b), ch. 166, SLA 1988 and codified in 1996, and were renumbered as
AS

10.06.504(d)

and (e) in 1997, at which time internal references in subsections (n) and (o) were conformed. Subsection (n) was enacted in § 57,
ch. 50, SLA 1989 and codified in 1996, at which time an internal reference was conformed. Subsection (o) was enacted in § 2,
ch. 24, SLA 1996 and codified in 1996, at which time an internal reference was conformed, and former subsection (k) was relettered as (p).

Subsection (p) was enacted as (q); relettered in 2015 at which time former subsection (p) was relettered as (q).

Cross references. —

As to status of land reconveyed to Native corporation, see editor’s note at Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act, § 14.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (n), substituted “AS

10.06.210

(1)(M)” for “AS

10.06.210

(1)(N).”

The second 2015 amendment, effective October 14, 2015, added (q) [now (p)].

The 2018 amendment, effective August 18, 2018, in (k), substituted “December 31, 2020” for “December 31, 2006” at the end of the first sentence.

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, in (n) and (o), added “, or by remote communication” at the end, and made related changes; in (p), in the first and second sentences, inserted “, by remote communication,” preceding “or by proxy”.

Editor’s notes —

Section 30,
ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 amendments to (n), (o), and (p) of this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.06.961.
Distributions by Native corporations to minors in the custody of a state.

Notwithstanding AS

13.46.085

or the appointment of a guardian of the property of the child under AS

47.10.010

, when a child who is in the custody of this state under AS 47.10 or a minor who is in the custody of this state under AS 47.12 or of another state under a provision similar to AS 47.10 or AS 47.12 becomes entitled to receive dividends or other distributions resulting from the ownership of stock or a membership in a corporation organized under this chapter and under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act), the corporation paying the dividends or making the other distributions shall retain the dividends and other distributions in an interest bearing account for the benefit of the child or minor during the state custody.

The corporation may not spend, obligate, or otherwise use the property held in an account established under (a) of this section unless the use is approved by a court.

Upon presentation of proof of entitlement by the person entitled to distribution, the corporation shall distribute the property remaining in an account established under (a) of this section to the

minor when the minor reaches the age of 18 years, whether or not the minor is still in the state custody;

legal guardian of the minor, when the state custody terminates while the minor is less than 18 years of age;

minor’s heirs if the minor dies before the distribution.

The retention and distribution of dividends and distributions under this section is not subject to AS 13.46.

In this section, “minor” means a person under 18 years of age.

History.

(§ 1 ch 81 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 15 ch 56 SLA 2005)

Sec. 10.06.963.
Severability.

If a provision of this chapter is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid provision.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.965.
Reservation of power.

The legislature reserves the right to alter, amend, suspend, or repeal in whole or in part this chapter at its pleasure, or a certificate of incorporation or the authority to do business in this state, of a domestic or foreign corporation, whether or not existing or authorized on July 1, 1989.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2012, “its” was inserted before “pleasure” to correct a manifest error in ch. 166, SLA 1988.

Sec. 10.06.968.
Signature.

“Signature” includes a mark when the signer cannot write. The signer’s name shall be written near the mark by a witness who shall write the witness’ own name near the signer’s name. A signature by mark can be acknowledged or can serve as a signature to a sworn statement.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Sec. 10.06.970.
Rules of construction and interpretation.

Unless a provision or the context otherwise requires, the following general provisions and rules of construction govern this chapter:

title, chapter, article, and section headings do not affect the scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of this chapter;

when, by the provisions of this chapter, a power is granted to, or a duty imposed upon, a public officer, the power may be exercised or the duty performed by a deputy of the officer or by a person authorized, under law, by the officer, unless this chapter expressly provides otherwise;

when a notice, report, statement, or record is required or authorized by this chapter, it shall be made in writing in a manner reasonably calculated to communicate the notice, report, statement, or record to the recipient;

a reference in this chapter to mailing means first-class mail, postage prepaid, unless certified mail is specified; certified mail includes registered mail;

subject to a specific accounting treatment required by a particular section of this chapter,

references in this chapter to financial statements, balance sheets, income statements, and statements of changes in financial position of a corporation and references to assets, liabilities, earnings, retained earnings, and similar accounting items of a corporation mean financial statements or items prepared fairly and reasonably to present the purported matters;

financial statements prepared or determined in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles then applicable are fair and reasonable;

references in this chapter to financial statements mean, in the case of a corporation that has subsidiaries, consolidated statements of the corporation and its subsidiaries, and all references to accounting items mean items determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with consolidated financial statements;

a reference in this chapter to the time a notice is given or sent means, unless otherwise expressly provided, the time a written notice by mail is deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid; or the time any other written notice is personally delivered to the recipient or is delivered to a common carrier for transmission, or actually transmitted by electronic means to the recipient by the person giving the notice; or the time an oral notice is communicated in person or by electronic means to the recipient or to a person at the office of the recipient whom the person giving the notice has reason to believe will promptly communicate it to the recipient;

when reference is made to any portion of this chapter or of any other law of this state, the reference applies to all amendments and additions;

“shall” is mandatory, “may” is permissive, and “may not” is prohibitory.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former paragraph (9) was renumbered as AS

10.06.990

(25) in 1989.

Sec. 10.06.990.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires,

“acknowledged” means that a document is accompanied by a certificate of its acknowledgment as provided in AS

09.63.010

—

09.63.130

;

“affiliate” means a person that directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with, a corporation subject to this chapter;

“alien” means

an individual who is not a citizen or national of the United States, or who is not lawfully admitted to the United States for permanent residence, or paroled into the United States under 8 U.S.C. 1101 — 1524 (Immigration and Nationality Act), as amended;

a person, other than an individual, that was not created or organized under the laws of the United States or of a state, or whose principal place of business is not located in any state; or

a person, other than an individual, that was created or organized under the laws of the United States or of a state, or whose principal place of business is located in a state, and that is controlled by a person described in (A) or (B) of this paragraph;

“approved by the board” or “approval of the board” means approved or ratified by the vote of the board or by the vote of a committee authorized to exercise the powers of the board, except as to matters not within the competence of the committee under AS

10.06.468

;

“approved by the outstanding shares” or “approval of the outstanding shares” means approved by the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares entitled to vote; this approval includes the affirmative vote of a majority of the outstanding shares of each class or series entitled by the articles of incorporation or this chapter to vote as a class or series on the subject matter and also includes the affirmative vote of a greater proportion, including all, of the outstanding shares of a class or series if a greater proportion is required by the articles or this chapter;

“approved by the shareholders” or “approval of the shareholders” means approved or ratified by the affirmative vote of a majority of the shares entitled to vote represented at a duly held meeting at which a quorum is present or by the written consent of shareholders (AS

10.06.423

) or by the affirmative vote or written consent of a greater proportion, including all, of the shares of a class or series if a greater proportion is required by the articles of incorporation or this chapter for all or any specified shareholder action;

“articles” or “articles of incorporation” means the original or restated articles of incorporation and all amendments and includes articles of merger;

“authorized shares” means the shares of all classes that the corporation may issue;

“board” means the board of directors of a domestic or foreign corporation;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development or a designee of the commissioner;

“common shares” means shares that have no preference over other shares with respect to distribution of assets on liquidation or with respect to payment of dividends;

“control” means

owning directly or indirectly, or having the power to vote, 25 percent or more of a class of voting securities of a corporation subject to this chapter; or

influencing or affecting in any substantive manner the election of a majority of the directors or trustees of a corporation subject to this chapter;

“corporation” or “domestic corporation” means a corporation for profit subject to the provisions of this chapter, but does not include a foreign corporation or a national bank;

“corporation tax” means the biennial corporation tax imposed under Alaska law on corporations;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“director” means a natural person designated in the articles of incorporation or elected by the incorporators as a director and includes a natural person and successor of that person designated, elected, or appointed by any other name or title to act as a director;

“distribution to its shareholders” means the transfer of cash or property by a corporation or its subsidiary to its shareholders without consideration, whether by way of dividend or otherwise, except a dividend in shares of the corporation, or the purchase or redemption of its shares for cash or property; the time of a distribution of a dividend is the date of the declaration of the dividend and the time of a distribution by purchase or redemption of shares is the date cash or property is transferred by the corporation, whether or not under a contract of an earlier date; however, if a negotiable debt security is issued in exchange for shares, the time of the distribution is the date when the corporation acquires the shares in the exchange; in the case of a sinking fund payment, cash or property is transferred within the meaning of this paragraph at the time that it is delivered to a trustee for the holders of preferred shares to be used for the redemption of those shares or physically segregated by the corporation in trust for that purpose;

“electronic transmission” means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper, that creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient of the communication and that may be directly reproduced in paper form by a recipient through an automated process;

“entire board” means the total number of directors that the corporation has if there are no vacancies;

“filed,” unless otherwise expressly provided, means filed in the office of the commissioner;

“five percent shareholder” means a person owning at least five percent of the shares or five percent of any class of shares of a corporation;

“foreign corporation” means a corporation for profit organized under laws other than the laws of Alaska for a purpose for which a corporation may be organized under this chapter;

“independent accountant” means a certified public accountant or a public accountant who is independent of the corporation as determined in accordance with generally accepted auditing standards and who is engaged to audit financial statements of the corporation or perform other accounting services;

“liquidation preference” means amounts payable for shares of a class upon voluntary or involuntary dissolution, winding up or distribution of the entire assets of the corporation, including any cumulative dividends accrued and unpaid, in priority to shares of another class or classes;

“net assets” means the amount by which the total assets of a corporation exceed the total debts of the corporation;

“oath” includes affirmation;

“officers’ certificate” means a certificate signed by the chair of the board, the president or a vice-president and by the secretary, the treasurer, or an assistant secretary or assistant treasurer;

“on the certificate” means that a statement appears on the face of a share certificate or on the reverse of the certificate with a reference to the statement on the face;

“organic change” means a merger, consolidation, share exchange, or sale of assets other than in the regular course of business;

“paid-in capital” means the consideration actually received by a corporation for issuance of its shares, plus any additional amount capitalized by its board under AS

10.06.390

;

“parent” means an affiliate controlling a specified corporation directly or indirectly through one or more intermediaries;

“person” means an individual, a corporation, a partnership, an association, a joint-stock company, an estate, a trust if the interests of the beneficiaries are evidenced by a security, an unincorporated association, a government, a political subdivision of a government, or a combination of these entities;

“preferred shares” means shares other than common shares;

“proxy” means a written authorization or an electronic transmission signed by a shareholder or the shareholder’s attorney-in-fact giving another person power to vote with respect to the shares of the shareholder;

“proxy holder” means the person to whom a proxy is given;

“redemption price” means the amount in cash, property or securities, or any combination of these, payable on shares of any class or series upon the redemption of the shares; unless otherwise expressly provided, the redemption price is payable in cash;

“remote communication” means communication by means of electronic communication, conference telephone, videoconference, the Internet, electronic transmission, or other means by which persons not physically present in the same location may communicate with and hear each other on a substantially simultaneous basis;

“retained earnings” means the account of the corporation representing undistributed and uncapitalized net profits, income, gains, and losses from the date of incorporation;

“series of shares” means those shares within a class that have the same rights, preferences, privileges, and restrictions but that differ in one or more rights, preferences, privileges, or restrictions from other shares within the same class;

“shareholder” means a holder of record of a share in a corporation;

“shares” means the units into which the proprietary interests in a corporation are divided;

“signed,” as it relates to proxies, means the placing of the shareholder’s name on the proxy by manual signature by the shareholder or the shareholder’s attorney-in-fact or by electronic means if the electronic means clearly demonstrates that the shareholder has authorized the placing of the shareholder’s name or the name of the shareholder’s attorney-in-fact on the proxy;

“state” means any of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Northern Mariana Islands, Guam, the Virgin Islands, American Samoa, the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, or any other territory or possession of the United States;

“subscriber” means one who subscribes for a share in a corporation before or after incorporation;

“subsidiary” of a specified corporation means a corporation in which the specified corporation owns more than 50 percent of the voting power directly or indirectly through one or more other subsidiaries of the specified corporation;

“vacancy” when used with respect to the board means any authorized position of director that is not then filled by a duly elected director, whether caused by death, resignation, removal, change in the authorized number of directors, or otherwise;

(45)

“surviving corporation” means a corporation into which one or more other corporations are merged;

(48)

“verified” means that a document has been certified to be true as provided in AS

09.63.040

;

(49)

“vote” includes authorization by written consent subject to the provisions of AS

10.06.423

and

10.06.475

;

(50)

“voting power” means the power to vote for the election of directors at the time a determination of voting power is made and does not include the right to vote upon the happening of a condition or event that has not yet occurred; when different classes of shares are entitled to vote as separate classes for different members of the board, the determination of percentage of voting power shall be made on the basis of the percentage of the total number of authorized directors that the shares in question have the power to elect in an election at which all shares then entitled to vote for the election of any directors are voted;

(51)

“writing” includes any form of recorded message capable of comprehension by ordinary visual means.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988; am §§ 55, 56 ch 82 SLA 1989; am § 98 ch 26 SLA 1993; am § 20 ch 65 SLA 1998; am §§ 7, 8 ch 103 SLA 2002; am §§ 16 — 18 ch 22 SLA 2015; am § 18 ch 1 SLA 2021)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

In 1989, 2002, 2012, and 2021, the paragraphs in this section were renumbered to maintain alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective May 15, 2015, in (3)(A), substituted “8 U.S.C. 1101 — 1524 (Immigration and Nationality Act), as amended” for “the Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. 1101 — 1525, as amended)”, in (24), deleted “ ‘liquidation price’ or” at the beginning, and in (31), deleted “or ‘parent corporation’ ” before “means an affiliate”.

The 2021 amendment, effective April 1, 2021, added (51) [now (37)].

Editor’s notes. —

Section 30,
ch. 1, SLA 2021, makes the 2021 enactment of paragraph (37) of this section retroactive to March 11, 2020.

Sec. 10.06.995.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Alaska Corporations Code.

History.

(§ 1 ch 166 SLA 1988)